Nevada, session 83, SB118.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that federal financial participation is
available, the Director shall include under Medicaid coverage for
services provided by a pharmacist that are:
(a) Within the authorized scope of practice of the pharmacist;
and
(b) Covered when provided by another provider of health care.
2. Medicaid must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services provided by a pharmacist to a
number of occasions less than for such services when provided by
another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by a pharmacist to an
amount less than the amount reimbursed for similar services
provided by a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse.
3. Medicaid or a managed care organization, including a
health maintenance organization, that provides health care
services to recipients of Medicaid shall not require a recipient of
Medicaid to obtain prior authorization for any service provided by
a pharmacist that is not required for the service when provided by
another provider of health care.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Health maintenance organization” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 695C.030.
(b) “Managed care organization” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.050.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. NRS 422.27172 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.27172 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration;
-
*SB118*

– 3 –
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion or removal of a device for contraception, including,
without limitation, the insertion of such a device at a hospital
immediately after a person gives birth;
(e) A contraceptive injection, including, without limitation, such
an injection immediately after a person gives birth.
(f) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraceptives and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(g) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(h) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, to
obtain any benefit provided in the Plan pursuant to subsection 1, a
person enrolled in Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible, any copayment or coinsurance; or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other condition.
3. The Director shall ensure that the provisions of this section
are carried out in a manner which complies with the requirements
established by the Drug Use Review Board and set forth in the list
of preferred prescription drugs established by the Department
pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
4. The Plan may require a person enrolled in Medicaid to pay a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for
contraception if the person refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent
of the contraceptive drug.
5. For each method of contraception which is approved by the
Food and Drug Administration, the Plan must include at least one
contraceptive drug or device for which no deductible, copayment or
coinsurance may be charged to the person enrolled in Medicaid, but
the Plan may charge a deductible, copayment or coinsurance for any
other contraceptive drug or device that provides the same method of
contraception. If the Plan requires a person enrolled in Medicaid to
pay a copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the
Plan may only require the person to pay the copayment or
coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
6. [The Plan must provide for the reimbursement of a
pharmacist for providing services described in subsection 1 that are
within the scope of practice of the pharmacist to the same extent as
if the services were provided by another provider of health care. The
Plan must not limit:
-
*SB118*

– 4 –
(a) Coverage for such services provided by a pharmacist to a
number of occasions less than the coverage for such services when
provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for such services provided by a pharmacist
to an amount less than the amount reimbursed for similar services
provided by a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse.
7.] The Plan must not require a recipient of Medicaid to obtain
prior authorization for the benefits described in paragraphs (a) and
(c) of subsection 1.
[8.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Drug Use Review Board” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 422.402.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.
Sec. 3. NRS 422.27235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.27235 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Any laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses
a drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
for preventing the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus.
(b) [The services of a pharmacist described in NRS 639.28085.
The State must provide reimbursement for such services at a rate
equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
(c)] Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
-
*SB118*

– 5 –
2. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that the State reimburse an advanced practice registered
nurse or a physician assistant for any service to test for, prevent or
treat human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar
services.
3. As used in this section, “primary care” means the practice of
family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and
gynecology and midwifery.
Sec. 4. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
-
*SB118*

– 6 –
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 5. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177 [,] and section 1 of this act, any contract
for group, blanket or individual health insurance or any contract by
a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or
organization for dental care which provides for payment of a certain
part of medical or dental care may require the insured or member to
obtain prior authorization for that care from the insurer or
organization. The insurer or organization shall:
-
*SB118*

– 7 –
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
respond to any request for approval by the insured or member
pursuant to this section within 20 days after it receives the request.
2. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
Sec. 6. NRS 422.27237 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act;
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
422.27237 State Plan for Medicaid: Inclusion of
requirement for payment of certain costs for services of
pharmacist; rate of reimbursement.
1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of expenditures
incurred for the services of a pharmacist described in
NRS 639.28079.
2. The State must provide reimbursement for the services of a
pharmacist described in NRS 639.28079 at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
H
-
*SB118*